District of Columbia statutes.
47-2888.06

Animal licenses.

A licensed veterinarian may issue animal licenses. The veterinarian shall collect the required fees and may collect an additional $2 for each license issued as reimbursement for administrative costs.

History

March 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 302(b), 61 DCR 1184